California statutes. Education Code
The department may waive any or all of the requirements of this subdivision as it determines is necessary to ensure that there are an adequate number of state-certified instructors in the state.

(c) (1) A state-certified schoolbus driver instructor of the appropriate class may instruct all applicants for a schoolbus, school pupil activity bus (SPAB), transit bus, or farm labor vehicle driver’s certificate.

(2) A state-certified school pupil activity bus (SPAB) driver instructor of the appropriate class may instruct all applicants for a school pupil activity bus (SPAB), transit bus, or farm labor vehicle driver’s certificate, but not a schoolbus certificate.

(3) A state-certified transit bus instructor of the appropriate class may instruct all applicants for a transit bus or farm labor driver’s certificate, but not a school pupil activity bus (SPAB) or a schoolbus certificate.

(4) A state-certified farm labor vehicle driver instructor may instruct applicants only for a certificate to drive a farm labor vehicle.

(d) A school pupil activity bus (SPAB), transit bus, schoolbus, or farm labor vehicle driver instructor certificate shall be valid until suspended, revoked, or canceled if it is accompanied by a valid driver’s license and a special driver’s certificate or valid driver’s license and endorsement of the appropriate class or is limited to classroom or in-service training only.

(e) The department may suspend or revoke a school pupil activity bus (SPAB), transit bus, schoolbus, or farm labor vehicle driver instructor certificate for any of the following causes:

(1) The certificate holder failed to comply with Section 40087.

(2) The certificate holder failed to comply with Section 40084.5.

(3) The certificate holder has committed an act listed in Section 13369 of the Vehicle Code or Section 13370 of that code.

(f) The department shall revoke a schoolbus, school pupil activity bus (SPAB), transit bus, or farm labor vehicle driver instructor certificate if the certificate holder falsified a State Department of Education Training Certificate T-01, T-02, or T-03.

(g) The department may cancel the driver instructor certificate for any of the following causes:

(1) The certificate holder has voluntarily requested cancellation.

(2) The certificate holder has his or her driving privilege suspended or revoked.

(3) The certificate holder has failed to meet the provisions required for retention of the driver instructor certificate. This includes failure to meet the instructor training requirements prescribed by Section 40084.5.

(4) The certificate holder does not possess a valid driver’s license, endorsement, or special driver’s certificate of the appropriate class.

(h) The department shall by regulation adopt an instructor certificate appeals procedure for subdivisions (e), (f), and (g).

(i) The Department of Motor Vehicles or the Department of the California Highway Patrol may disallow the driver training documentation provided pursuant to Section 40087 signed by any driver instructor certified pursuant to Section 40081 if either of those departments finds that the instructor’s certificate would have been suspended, revoked, or canceled for any of the reasons designated in subdivision (e), (f), or (g).

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 646, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

40089.

(a) A school pupil activity bus (SPAB), transit bus, schoolbus, or farm labor vehicle driver instructor with no instructional limitations shall conduct at least 20 hours of instruction each 12 months that includes at least 10 hours of behind-the-wheel and 10 hours of classroom training, which need not be given in a single session. A school pupil activity bus (SPAB), transit bus, schoolbus, or farm labor vehicle driver instructor limited to either classroom or behind-the-wheel training only shall conduct at least 10 hours of instruction each 12 months that includes at least 10 hours of behind-the-wheel or classroom training depending on the limitation. The training need not be given in a single session. A school pupil activity bus (SPAB), transit bus, schoolbus, or farm labor vehicle driver instructor limited to in-service training only shall conduct at least 10 hours of in-service training each 12 months. All school pupil activity bus (SPAB), transit bus, schoolbus, and farm labor vehicle driver instructor training conducted by department staff may be accepted in lieu of the requirements of this subdivision.

(b) A school pupil activity bus (SPAB), transit bus, schoolbus, or farm labor vehicle driver instructor may be limited to classroom instruction, behind-the-wheel training or in-service training only, and prohibited from recording, documenting, or signing for any training required by this article, as determined by the department.

(c) A school pupil activity bus (SPAB), transit bus, schoolbus, or farm labor vehicle driver instructor shall be limited to behind-the-wheel instruction in vehicles that the instructor is qualified to drive.

(d) All school pupil activity bus (SPAB), transit bus, schoolbus, or farm labor vehicle driver instructor training required by subdivision (a) shall be properly documented on a State Department of Education Training Certificate T-01, and signed by the state-certified instructor at the end of each 12-month training period. The signature certifies that the required instruction was conducted during the 12-month training period. Upon renewal of the instructor driver’s license, endorsement, or certificate, the completed instructor training record, recorded on the State Department of Education Training Certificate T-01, shall be submitted to the department in Sacramento.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 646, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

40090.

The department may assess fees to any instructor applicant who will be training drivers of any vehicle as defined in Section 322, 545, 546, or 642 of the Vehicle Code. The fees may not be more than necessary to offset the department’s reasonable costs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 15, Sec. 21.   (AB 99)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

40090.5.

Employers shall take all action necessary to make available to every transit busdriver required to be trained pursuant to Section 40083 or 40085.5 the opportunity to be trained without the loss of wages or benefits.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 646, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------



  PART 24. SCHOOL FINANCE [41000. - 43052.]



  CHAPTER 1. State Financial Management and Control [41000. - 41060.]



  ARTICLE 1. Moneys Received by School Districts [41000. - 41003.]

41000.

No assessor, tax collector, city, city and county, or county treasurer shall charge or receive any fees or compensation for assessing, collecting, receiving, keeping, or disbursing any school moneys, but the whole moneys collected shall be paid to the city, city and county, or county treasurer.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

41001.

The governing board of every school district shall pay all moneys received or collected by it from any source and all moneys apportioned to it from taxes levied and collected under the authority of city councils for school purposes, into the county treasury to be placed to the credit of the proper fund of its district. All money collected by the city council or other governing body of any municipality from taxes levied for school purposes when received shall be paid into the county treasury to the credit of the school district for the schools of which the taxes were levied. All deposits and payments required by this section shall be made daily, unless the county superintendent of schools authorizes them to be made weekly or otherwise, but in no event less frequently than monthly.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

41002.

All moneys received by any school district or paid into the county or city and county treasury to the credit of the district from state apportionments, county, district or municipal taxes, other than moneys required to be placed in a separate fund of the school district, shall be deposited in the general fund of the district, which fund shall be in existence in each county and city and county treasury.

Nothing in this section shall be construed as discontinuing, nor as affecting the disposition of moneys in any of the separate funds of the school districts legally created or established in law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 917, Sec. 13.)
-------------------------------------------

41002.5.

Notwithstanding Sections 41001 and 41002, money received from the sources, or for the purposes listed in subdivisions (a) to (h), inclusive, may be deposited in a bank or other financial institution whose accounts are federally insured. Any money so deposited shall be in an account or accounts fully covered by that insurance:

(a) Funds received for the purpose of making loans, scholarships, or grants to students in, or graduates of, a school under the jurisdiction of the governing board of the district. 

(b) Funds received for the sale of food or other services performed by one or more cafeterias established in the schools of the district. 

(c) Funds received from the sale of produce, livestock, and other products of one or more school farms established in the district. 

(d) Clearing accounts established pursuant to Section 41017. 

(e) Funds of a student body organization. 

(f) Funds in a revolving cash fund established pursuant to Section 42820. 

(g) Funds for community recreation programs established pursuant to Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 10900) of Part 7.

(h) Funds that, pursuant to any other law or provision of the California School Accounting Manual, may be deposited in a bank or other federally insured financial institution in lieu of the county treasury.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 68, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

41003.

The governing board of a school district may, by resolution, specify the particular fund or funds maintained for the district into which shall be deposited moneys received for the rental or lease of real property.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Accounting Regulations, Budget Controls and Audits [41010. - 41024.]

41010.

The accounting system used to record the financial affairs of any school district shall be in accordance with the definitions, instructions, and procedures published in the California School Accounting Manual as approved by the State Board of Education and furnished by the Superintendent of Public Instruction. No accounting manual so approved shall expressly or by implication affect the content of any educational program or objective, except as otherwise specifically provided for by this code. The Legislature hereby finds that such content shall be best determined by those involved in the administration of educational programs, including school district governing boards, local administrators, teachers, students, and parents.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

41011.

The accounting system used to record the financial affairs of any school district shall be designed to provide separate recording and clear distinction between expenditures for salaries of classroom teachers employed by the district and expenditures for other purposes of the district.

As used in this section “salaries of classroom teachers” means:

(a) The salary paid to each teacher employed by the district whose duties require that the full time for which the teacher is employed be devoted to the teaching of pupils of the district.

(b) The portion of the salary of each teacher whose duties require that a part, but not all, of the full time for which the teacher is employed be devoted to the teaching of pupils of the district, which is equal to the portion of such full time actually devoted by the teacher to teaching pupils of the district.

(c) The salary paid to each instructional aide employed by the district, any portion of whose duties are required to be performed under the supervision of a classroom teacher.

As used in this section a “teacher” means an employee of the district employed in a position requiring certification qualifications and whose duties require him to teach pupils of the district for at least one full instructional period each schoolday for which the employee is employed. In the case of a teacher employed to teach in an elementary school, an instructional period is a period of not less than 20 minutes. In the case of a teacher employed to teach in a secondary school, an instructional period is the number of minutes equal to the number of minutes of the regular academic period in the junior high school, or high school, in which the teacher is employed to teach.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

41011.1.

(a) The accounting system used to record the financial affairs of any local educational agency shall be designed to provide a separate accounting of expenditures related to actual payments of legal settlements, judgments, or special assessments by a joint pooling arrangement, as a result of claims pursuant to Chapter 861 of the Statutes of 2019 (Assembly Bill 218 of the 2019–20 Regular Session) and Chapter 655 of the Statutes of 2023 (Assembly Bill 452 of the 2023–24 Regular Session).

(b) The accounting system used to record financial affairs of any local educational agency shall be designed to provide a separate accounting of expenditures related to actual payments of legal settlements, judgments, or special assessments by a joint pooling
 arrangement, as a result of civil claims that are not captured pursuant to subdivision (a).

(c) For purposes of this section, “local educational agency” means a school district, county office of education, charter school, or joint powers authority established pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 6500) of Chapter 5 of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code consisting of a combination of school districts, county offices of education, or charter schools.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 8, Sec. 16.   (AB 121)   Effective June 27, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

41012.

For purposes of determining allowances pursuant to Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 52200) of Part 28, and Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 56500) and Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 56600) of Part 30, the Superintendent of Public Instruction shall require the use of a uniform cost accounting procedure, as set forth in the California School Accounting Manual.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 89, Sec. 8.   Effective June 30, 1998.   Operative July 1, 1998, by Sec. 62 of Ch. 89.)
-------------------------------------------

41013.

For the purpose of achieving clarity and uniformity in the budgeting and reporting of school district expenditures by funds, whenever certain expenditures for the children’s center program, the development center for handicapped minors program, or any similar program, except the food service program, for which a special fund is required by law, are: (1) authorized by law and by action of the governing board to be paid from the general fund of the school district, or (2) required by law to be paid from the general fund of the school district, the amount estimated or actually required to meet these expenditures shall be transferred or paid from the general fund to the children’s center fund, the development center for handicapped minors fund, or other special fund as appropriate.

Any amount transferred or paid in excess of the amount actually required shall be refunded to the general fund.

The Superintendent of Public Instruction is hereby authorized to adopt rules and regulations governing the method of accounting for said payments and transfers.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

41014.

Excepting only as provided in Article 1 (commencing with Section 41000) and this article, all constitutional and statutory limitations on the purposes for which moneys derived from particular specified sources may be expended, and all statutory provisions relative to the establishment of specified school district funds, shall be administered by county superintendents of schools, or in the discretion of county auditors, by county superintendents of schools and county auditors by means of budgetary accounting and not by the establishment and maintenance in the county or city and county treasury of special school district funds.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

41015.

The governing board of any school district or any county office of education which has funds in a special reserve fund of the district or county office of education or any surplus moneys not required for the immediate necessities of the district or county office of education, is hereby authorized to invest all or any part of the funds in any of the investments specified in Section 16430 or 53601 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 198, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

41016.

The governing board of a school district which has made an investment pursuant to the authority of Section 41015 may deposit such security for safekeeping with a state or national bank or trust company located within this state or with the Federal Reserve Bank of San Francisco or any branch thereof within the state, or with any Federal Reserve bank or with any state or national bank located in any city designated as a reserve city by the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System. The governing board shall take from such bank a receipt for the security so deposited. The county treasurer with whom such funds if uninvested would be deposited shall not be responsible for securities delivered to and receipted for by a bank under the authority of this section until they are withdrawn from the bank by said treasurer.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

41017.

The governing board of any school district or any county office of education may authorize any school district governed by it, or any school under its jurisdiction to deposit in one or more bank accounts as clearing accounts any miscellaneous receipts, including receipts from the sale of property or materials pursuant to Section 39526 or 39527, received or collected by the school district or county office of education, and may provide for the withdrawals from those accounts. All moneys in those bank accounts shall be paid into the county treasury within the time periods specified pursuant to Section 41001. Cashiers’ checks, certified checks, and money placed in the custody of the school district or county office of education as security that a bidder will execute or faithfully perform a contract, if awarded to him or her, may be deposited in those bank accounts but shall not be paid into the county treasury to the credit of the school district or county office of education unless forfeited or unless unclaimed by the bidder for a period of 12 months.

Such bank accounts shall not be subject to the deposit of funds provisions of Article 2 (commencing with Section 53630) of Chapter 4 of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code, except to the extent provided by Section 53679 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 198, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

41018.

The governing board of any school district or any county office of education having an average daily attendance of 100,000 or more may deposit in one or more bank accounts moneys received from the temporary rental of property acquired by a school district or county office of education pending construction of school facilities on the property. The moneys may be held in the accounts for a period of not to exceed three years and may be used to pay any proper costs incurred as a result of the temporary rental, provided that when the moneys are not being used to pay the costs they may be invested, along with all other moneys deposited in clearing accounts, pursuant to Section 41015 as determined by the governing board of the school district or the county office of education. The moneys invested pursuant to this section shall be invested with the care, skill, prudence, and diligence under the circumstances then prevailing that a prudent person acting in a like capacity and familiar with these matters would use in the conduct of an enterprise of like character and with like aims.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 198, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

41019.

The governing board of any school district which maintains clearing accounts, cafeteria accounts, and other accounts in a bank or banks, pursuant to Section 41017 or 39892, or pursuant to any other provisions of law, may contract and pay for the expenses of transporting money to and from such bank or banks.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

41020.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature to encourage sound fiscal management practices among local educational agencies for the most efficient and effective use of public funds for the education of children in California by strengthening fiscal accountability at the school district, county, and state levels.

(b) A local educational agency shall post the local educational agency’s annual financial and compliance audits on its internet website.

(c) (1) (A) On or before May 1 of each fiscal year, the governing board of each school district or educational joint powers authority shall either provide for an audit of all funds under
 the control of that school district or educational joint powers authority, including an audit of income and expenditures by source of funds, or shall make arrangements with the county superintendent of schools having jurisdiction over the school district or educational joint powers authority to provide for that auditing.

(B) A contract to perform the audit of a
 school district or educational joint powers authority that has a disapproved budget or has received a negative certification on any budget or interim financial report during the current fiscal year or either of the two preceding fiscal years, or for which the county superintendent of schools has otherwise determined that a lack of going concern exists, is not valid unless approved by the responsible county superintendent of schools and the governing board of the school district or educational joint powers authority.

(2) (A) On or before May 1 of each fiscal year, the governing body of
 each charter school shall either provide for an audit of all funds under the control of the charter school, including an audit of income and expenditures by source of funds, or shall make arrangements with the chartering authority to provide for that auditing. Except as provided in clause (ii) of subparagraph (B), an independent audit shall be separately conducted and reported for each charter school.

(B) (i) All charter schools shall be audited and subject to the applicable provisions of this section.

(ii) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), financial data for charter schools that are included in the school district or county office of education audit shall be presented separately in one of the following manners:

(I) As a major fund, when applicable.

(II) As a supplementary balance sheet and statement of revenues, expenditures, and changes in fund balance.

(III) As supplementary combining statements for charter schools that are accounted for in the general fund or when multiple charter schools are included in the charter school fund.

(3) On or before May 1 of each fiscal year, each county superintendent of schools shall either provide for an audit of all funds under their jurisdiction and control, including an audit of income and expenditures by source of funds, or shall make arrangements with the Controller to provide for that auditing.

(d) If the governing board of a
 school district or educational joint powers authority, the governing body of a charter school, or a county superintendent of schools, pursuant to paragraphs (1) to (3), inclusive, of subdivision (c), has not provided for an audit of the books and accounts of the local educational agency by May 1, one of the following shall apply, as applicable, and in sufficient time to ensure compliance with the deadline established in subdivision (k):

(1) For a school district or an educational joint powers authority, the county superintendent of schools having jurisdiction over the school district or educational joint powers authority shall provide for the audit.

(2) For a charter school, the chartering authority having jurisdiction over the charter school shall provide for the audit.

(3) For a county superintendent of schools, the Controller shall provide for the audit.

(e) An audit conducted pursuant to this section shall comply fully with the generally accepted government auditing standards promulgated by the United States Government Accountability Office.

(f) Each audit conducted in accordance with this section shall include all of the following:

(1) All funds, books, and accounts of the local educational agency, including the student body and cafeteria funds and accounts and any other funds under the control or jurisdiction of the local educational agency.

(2) An audit of pupil attendance procedures and other applicable compliance items as detailed in the audit guide adopted pursuant to Section 14502.1.

(3) A determination of whether funds were expended pursuant to a local control and accountability plan or an approved annual update to a local control and accountability plan
 pursuant to Article 4.5 (commencing with Section 52059.5) of Chapter 6.1 of Part 28 of Division
 4 or, for a charter school, Section 47606.5.

(g) All audit reports for each fiscal year shall be developed and reported using a format established by the Controller after consultation with the Superintendent and the Director of Finance.

(h) (1) The cost of
 an audit provided for by a county superintendent of schools
 for a school district or educational joint powers authority shall be paid from the county school service fund and the county superintendent of schools shall transfer the pro rata share of the cost chargeable to each school district or educational joint powers authority from school district or educational joint powers authority funds.

(2) The cost of an audit provided for by a chartering authority for a charter school shall be paid by the chartering authority and the chartering authority shall collect the pro rata share of the cost chargeable to each charter school from charter school funds.

(3) The cost of an audit provided for by the Controller for a county superintendent of schools shall be paid by the Controller and the Controller shall collect the pro rata share of the cost chargeable to each county superintendent of schools from the respective county school service fund.

(4) The cost of
 an audit provided for by a governing board or body of a local educational agency shall be paid from local educational agency funds. The audit of the funds under the jurisdiction and control of a county superintendent of schools shall be paid from the county school service fund.

(i) (1) The audits shall be
 made by a certified public accountant or a public accountant, licensed by the California Board of Accountancy, and selected by the local educational agency, as applicable, from a directory of certified public accountants and public accountants deemed by the Controller as qualified to conduct audits of local educational agencies, which shall be published by the Controller on or before December 31 of each year.

(2) Commencing with the 2003–04 fiscal year and except as provided in subdivision (d) of Section 41320.1, it is unlawful for a public accounting firm to provide audit services to a local educational agency if the lead audit partner, or coordinating audit partner, having primary responsibility for the audit, or the audit partner
 responsible for reviewing the audit, has performed audit services for that local educational agency in each of the six previous fiscal years. The Education Audit Appeals Panel may waive this requirement if the panel finds that no otherwise eligible auditor is available to perform the audit.

(3) It is the intent of the Legislature that, notwithstanding paragraph (2), the rotation within public accounting firms conform to provisions of the federal Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002 (15 U.S.C. Sec. 7201 et seq.), and upon release of the
 report required by the act of the Comptroller General of the United States addressing the mandatory rotation of registered public accounting firms, the Legislature intends to reconsider paragraph (2). In determining which certified public accountants and public accountants shall be included in the directory, the Controller shall use the following criteria:

(A) The certified public accountants or public accountants shall be in good standing as certified by the Board of Accountancy.

(B) The certified public accountants or public accountants, as a result of a quality control review conducted by the Controller pursuant to Section 14504.2, shall not have been found to have conducted an audit in a manner constituting noncompliance with Section 14503.

(4) (A) (i) Commencing with the 2027–28 fiscal year, and every two years thereafter, in order to be added to, or remain on, the Controller’s directory of certified public accountants and public accountants deemed qualified to conduct audits of local educational agencies, audit engagement partners and certified public accountants or public accountants responsible for local educational agency audits and audit staff who perform audit procedures of local educational agencies shall complete 16 hours of continuing education that, at a minimum, covers both of the following:

(I) Training on the specific requirements included in the most current Guide for Annual Audits of K–12 Local Education Agencies and State Compliance Reporting.

(II) Training on compliance topics that include, but
 are not limited to, pupil attendance, independent study, charter schools, school calendars, instructional minutes, and, if applicable, nonclassroom-based instruction.

(ii) Continuing education hours taken as part of the California Board of Accountancy license renewal requirements may be used to meet the requirements of clause (i) if the continuing education is specific to local educational agencies and includes the training content described in subclauses (I) and (II) of clause (i).

(B) Commencing with the 2027–28 fiscal year, in order to be added to, or remain on, the Controller’s directory of certified public accountants and public accountants deemed qualified to conduct audits of local educational agencies, audit engagement partners, certified public accountant firms, and certified public accountants or public accountants responsible for local educational agency audits shall
 comply with both of the following:

(i) (I) Have demonstrated experience of two or more years conducting financial and compliance audits for local educational agencies.

(II) Notwithstanding subclause (I), audit engagement partners, certified public accountant firms, and certified public accountants or public accountants may perform a financial and compliance audit for a local educational agency during their first two years of conducting those audits, provided the audit report receives a preissuance review, consistent with applicable professional standards on quality control, performed by an auditor that has demonstrated experience in conducting financial and compliance audits for local educational agencies.

(ii) Have maintained compliance with the California Board of Accountancy requirements to
 keep applicable licenses in active status and good standing.

(C) The continuing education hours and prior experience required pursuant to this paragraph shall be evidenced by a certification to the Controller from the certified public accountant firm, the certified public accountant or public accountant, or the audit staff that the requirements have been met.

(5) The requirements of this subdivision shall apply to audits of local educational agencies regardless of whether the local educational agency is a governmental agency or a nonprofit organization.

(6) (A) A local educational agency and an auditor that is under contract with the local educational agency shall notify the chartering authority or the county superintendent of schools, as applicable, the Superintendent, and the Controller in the
 event that the auditor’s contract with the local educational agency is terminated or otherwise denied for renewal. The notification shall include the reason for the termination or denial for renewal and shall be made within 30 calendar days of the effective date of that termination or nonrenewal.

(B) (i) Before accepting a new engagement for a local educational agency, auditors shall request the local educational agency to provide authorization for predecessor auditors to respond fully and without limitation to the successor auditor’s inquiries and request to examine work papers related to subparagraph (C).

(ii) If the local educational agency refuses to authorize predecessor auditors to respond, or limits the response, the auditor shall inquire about the reasons and consider the implications of that refusal or limitation in deciding whether to accept the
 engagement.

(iii) If the local educational agency provides permission for predecessor auditors to respond fully, the successor auditor shall make the following inquiries of the predecessor auditors:

(I) Their knowledge of information that might bear on the integrity of management of the local educational agency.

(II) Whether there were any disagreements with management of the local educational agency regarding matters of accounting principles, financial reporting, compliance, or audit scope.

(III) Whether there were any communications to management of the local educational agency regarding fraud, illegal acts, noncompliance, or internal control matters.

(IV) The predecessor auditor’s
 understanding of the reason for the change of auditors.

(V) Any information relevant to the successor auditor’s risk assessments for the period being audited.

(C) The successor auditor may request to inspect work papers as needed to gain full context of any risks identified through inquiry or to perform necessary procedures on beginning balances.

(j) (1) The auditor’s report shall include each of the following:

(A) A statement that
 the audit was conducted pursuant to standards and procedures developed in accordance with Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 14500) of Part 9 of Division 1 of Title 1.

(B) A summary of audit exceptions and management improvement recommendations.

(C) An evaluation by the auditor on whether there is substantial doubt about the ability of the local educational agency to continue as a going concern for a reasonable period of time.

(2) To the extent possible, a description of correction or plan
 of correction shall be incorporated in the audit report, describing the specific actions that are planned to be taken, or that have been taken, to correct the problem identified by the auditor. The descriptions of specific actions to be taken or that have been taken shall not solely consist of general comments such as “will implement,” “accepted the recommendation,” or “will discuss at a later date.”

(k) (1) On or before January 31 of each year, a report of each local educational agency audit for the preceding fiscal year shall be filed with specified entities, as follows:

(A) For school districts and educational joint powers authorities, with the county superintendent of schools of the county in which the local educational agency is located, the Superintendent, and the Controller.

(B) For charter schools, with its chartering authority, the Superintendent, the Controller, and the county superintendent of schools of the county in which the charter school is located, unless the county board of education of the county in which the charter school is located is the chartering authority.

(C) For county superintendents of schools, with
 the Superintendent and the Controller.

(2) The Superintendent shall make any adjustments necessary in future apportionments of all state funds to correct any audit exceptions revealed by those audit reports pursuant to Section 41344.

(l) (1) Pursuant to this section and subdivision (e) of Section 41320.1, upon submission of the final audit report to the governing board of each school district or educational joint powers authority and subsequent receipt of the audit by
 the county superintendent of schools having jurisdiction over the school district or educational joint powers authority, the county superintendent of schools shall do all of the following:

(A) Review audit exceptions related to attendance, inventory of equipment, internal control, teacher misassignments pursuant to Section 44258.9, instructional
 materials and information reported on the school accountability report card pursuant to Section 33126, and other miscellaneous exceptions. Attendance exceptions or issues shall include, but not be limited to, those related to local control funding formula allocations pursuant to Section 42238.02, as implemented by Section 42238.03, and independent study.

(B) If a description of the correction or plan of correction has not been provided as part of the audit required by this section, the county superintendent of schools shall
 notify the
 school district or educational joint powers authority and request the governing board of the school district or educational joint powers authority to provide to the county superintendent of schools a description of the corrections or plan of correction
 on or before April 15.

(C) Review the description of correction or plan of correction and determine its adequacy. If the description of the correction or plan of correction is not adequate, the county superintendent of schools shall require the
 school district or educational joint powers authority to resubmit that portion of its response that is inadequate.

(2) Each county superintendent of schools shall certify to the Superintendent and the Controller, on or before June 15 of each year, that the county superintendent of schools’ staff has reviewed all audits of school districts or educational joint powers authorities under the county superintendent of schools’ jurisdiction for the prior fiscal year, that all exceptions that the county superintendent
 of schools was required to review were reviewed, and that all of those exceptions, except as otherwise noted in the certification, have been corrected by the school district or educational joint powers authority or that an acceptable plan of correction has been submitted to the county superintendent of schools. In addition, the county superintendent of schools shall identify, by